Utah statutes.
41-22-12.1.   Restrictions on use of snowmobile trails.

A person may not operate a wheeled vehicle with a gross vehicle weight of 800 pounds or more on any snowmobile trail that the division has marked, posted, designated, or maintained as a snowmobile trail.

